Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.460

Damages from administrative action, stop sales or seizures.

No state court shall allow the recovery of damages from administrative action taken or for stop sales or seizures under RCW 15.54.440 and 15.54.450 if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 34.]